Illinois, session 104th, HB2374.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency 5Treatment Act is amended by changing Sections 1a, 2, 2.05, 62.1, 2.2, 5, 5.3, 5.4, 7.5, and 10 as follows: 7    (410 ILCS 70/1a)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 87-1a)8    Sec. 1a. Definitions. 9    (a) In this Act:10    "Acute sexual assault" means a sexual assault that has 11recently occurred. For patients under the age of 13, this 12means a sexual assault that has occurred within the past 72 13hours. For patients 13 years old or older, this means a sexual 14assault that has occurred within the past 168 hours. 15    "Advanced practice registered nurse" has the meaning 16provided in Section 50-10 of the Nurse Practice Act. 17    "Ambulance provider" means an individual or entity that 18owns and operates a business or service using ambulances or 19emergency medical services vehicles to transport emergency 20patients. 21    "Approved pediatric health care facility" means a health 22care facility, other than a hospital, with a sexual assault 23treatment plan approved by the Department to provide medical   HB2374- 2 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1forensic services to sexual assault survivors under the age of 218 who present with a complaint of acute sexual assault within 3a minimum of the last 7 days or who have disclosed past sexual 4assault by a specific individual and were in the care of that 5individual within a minimum of the last 7 days. 6    "Areawide sexual assault treatment plan" means a plan, 7developed by hospitals or by hospitals and approved pediatric 8health care facilities in a community or area to be served, 9which provides for medical forensic services to acute sexual 10assault survivors that shall be made available by each of the 11participating hospitals and approved pediatric health care 12facilities. 13    "Board-certified child abuse pediatrician" means a 14physician certified by the American Board of Pediatrics in 15child abuse pediatrics.16    "Board-eligible child abuse pediatrician" means a 17physician who has completed the requirements set forth by the 18American Board of Pediatrics to take the examination for 19certification in child abuse pediatrics. 20    "Department" means the Department of Public Health. 21    "Emergency contraception" means medication as approved by 22the federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA) that can 23significantly reduce the risk of pregnancy if taken within 72 24hours after sexual assault. 25    "Follow-up healthcare" means healthcare services related 26to a sexual assault, including laboratory services and   HB2374- 3 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1pharmacy services, rendered within 180 days of the initial 2visit for medical forensic services. 3    "Health care professional" means a physician, a physician 4assistant, a sexual assault forensic examiner, an advanced 5practice registered nurse, a registered professional nurse, a 6licensed practical nurse, or a sexual assault nurse examiner. 7    "Hospital" means a hospital licensed under the Hospital 8Licensing Act or operated under the University of Illinois 9Hospital Act, any outpatient center included in the hospital's 10sexual assault treatment plan where hospital employees provide 11medical forensic services, and an out-of-state hospital that 12has consented to the jurisdiction of the Department under 13Section 2.06. 14    "Illinois State Police Sexual Assault Evidence Collection 15Kit" means a prepackaged set of materials and forms to be used 16for the collection of evidence relating to sexual assault. The 17standardized evidence collection kit for the State of Illinois 18shall be the Illinois State Police Sexual Assault Evidence 19Collection Kit. 20    "Law enforcement agency having jurisdiction" means the law 21enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where an alleged sexual 22assault or sexual abuse occurred.23    "Licensed practical nurse" has the meaning provided in 24Section 50-10 of the Nurse Practice Act. 25    "Medical forensic services" means health care delivered to 26patients within or under the care and supervision of personnel   HB2374- 4 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1working in a designated emergency department of a hospital or 2an approved pediatric health care facility. "Medical forensic 3services" includes, but is not limited to, taking a medical 4history, performing photo documentation, performing a physical 5and anogenital examination, assessing the patient for evidence 6collection, collecting evidence in accordance with a statewide 7sexual assault evidence collection program administered by the 8Illinois State Police using the Illinois State Police Sexual 9Assault Evidence Collection Kit, if appropriate, assessing the 10patient for drug-facilitated or alcohol-facilitated sexual 11assault, providing an evaluation of and care for sexually 12transmitted infection and human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), 13pregnancy risk evaluation and care, and discharge and 14follow-up healthcare planning. 15    "Pediatric health care facility" means a clinic or 16physician's office that provides medical services to patients 17under the age of 18.18    "Pediatric sexual assault survivor" means a person under 19the age of 13 who presents for medical forensic services in 20relation to injuries or trauma resulting from a sexual 21assault.22    "Photo documentation" means digital photographs or 23colposcope videos stored and backed up securely in the 24original file format. 25    "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine 26in all its branches.   HB2374- 5 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1    "Physician assistant" has the meaning provided in Section 24 of the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987.3    "Prepubescent sexual assault survivor" means a female who 4is under the age of 18 years and has not had a first menstrual 5cycle or a male who is under the age of 18 years and has not 6started to develop secondary sex characteristics who presents 7for medical forensic services in relation to injuries or 8trauma resulting from a sexual assault.9    "Qualified medical provider" means a board-certified child 10abuse pediatrician, board-eligible child abuse pediatrician, a 11sexual assault forensic examiner, or a sexual assault nurse 12examiner who has access to photo documentation tools, and who 13participates in peer review. 14    "Registered Professional Nurse" has the meaning provided 15in Section 50-10 of the Nurse Practice Act. 16    "Sexual assault" means:17        (1) an act of sexual conduct; as used in this 18    paragraph, "sexual conduct" has the meaning provided under 19    Section 11-0.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012; or20        (2) any act of sexual penetration; as used in this 21    paragraph, "sexual penetration" has the meaning provided 22    under Section 11-0.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012 and 23    includes, without limitation, acts prohibited under 24    Sections 11-1.20 through 11-1.60 of the Criminal Code of 25    2012. 26    "Sexual assault forensic examiner" means a physician or   HB2374- 6 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1physician assistant who has completed training that meets or 2is substantially similar to the Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner 3Education Guidelines established by the International 4Association of Forensic Nurses.5    "Sexual assault nurse examiner" means an advanced practice 6registered nurse or registered professional nurse who has 7completed a sexual assault nurse examiner training program 8that meets the Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Education 9Guidelines established by the International Association of 10Forensic Nurses.11    "Sexual assault services voucher" means a document 12generated by a hospital or approved pediatric health care 13facility at the time the sexual assault survivor receives 14outpatient medical forensic services that may be used to seek 15payment for any ambulance services, medical forensic services, 16laboratory services, pharmacy services, and follow-up 17healthcare provided as a result of the sexual assault. 18    "Sexual assault survivor" means a person who presents for 19medical forensic services in relation to injuries or trauma 20resulting from a sexual assault. 21    "Sexual assault transfer plan" means a written plan 22developed by a hospital and approved by the Department, which 23describes the hospital's procedures for transferring acute 24sexual assault survivors to another hospital, and an approved 25pediatric health care facility, if applicable, in order to 26receive medical forensic services performed by a qualified   HB2374- 7 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1medical provider.2    "Sexual assault treatment plan" means a written plan that 3describes the procedures and protocols for providing medical 4forensic services to acute sexual assault survivors who 5present themselves to a qualified medical provider for such 6services, either directly or through transfer from a hospital 7or an approved pediatric health care facility. 8    "Transfer hospital" means a hospital with a sexual assault 9transfer plan approved by the Department. 10    "Transfer services" means the appropriate medical 11screening examination and necessary stabilizing treatment 12prior to the transfer of a sexual assault survivor to another a 13hospital or an approved pediatric health care facility that 14provides medical forensic services to sexual assault survivors 15pursuant to a sexual assault treatment plan or areawide sexual 16assault treatment plan.17    "Treatment hospital" means a hospital with a sexual 18assault treatment plan approved by the Department to provide 19medical forensic services to acute all sexual assault 20survivors who present with a complaint of sexual assault 21within a minimum of the last 7 days or who have disclosed past 22sexual assault by a specific individual and were in the care of 23that individual within a minimum of the last 7 days.24    "Treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer" 25means a hospital with a treatment plan approved by the 26Department to provide medical forensic services to sexual   HB2374- 8 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1assault survivors 13 years old or older who present with a 2complaint of acute sexual assault within a minimum of the last 37 days or who have disclosed past sexual assault by a specific 4individual and were in the care of that individual within a 5minimum of the last 7 days. 6    (b) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 72024. 8(Source: P.A. 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 9102-674, eff. 11-30-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1097, eff. 101-1-23; 102-1106, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 11    (410 ILCS 70/2)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 87-2)12    Sec. 2. Hospital and approved pediatric health care 13facility requirements for sexual assault plans. 14    (a) Every hospital required to be licensed by the 15Department pursuant to the Hospital Licensing Act, or operated 16under the University of Illinois Hospital Act that provides 17general medical and surgical hospital services shall provide 18either (i) transfer services to all acute sexual assault 19survivors, (ii) medical forensic services to all acute sexual 20assault survivors, or (iii) transfer services to pediatric 21acute sexual assault survivors and medical forensic services 22to acute sexual assault survivors 13 years old or older, in 23accordance with rules adopted by the Department.24    In addition, every such hospital, regardless of whether or 25not a request is made for reimbursement, shall submit to the   HB2374- 9 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1Department a plan to provide either (i) transfer services to 2all acute sexual assault survivors, (ii) medical forensic 3services to all acute sexual assault survivors, or (iii) 4transfer services to pediatric acute sexual assault survivors 5and medical forensic services to acute sexual assault 6survivors 13 years old or older within the time frame 7established by the Department. The Department shall approve 8such plan for either (i) transfer services to all acute sexual 9assault survivors, (ii) medical forensic services to all acute 10sexual assault survivors, or (iii) transfer services to 11pediatric acute sexual assault survivors and medical forensic 12services to acute sexual assault survivors 13 years old or 13older, if it finds that the implementation of the proposed 14plan would provide (i) transfer services or (ii) medical 15forensic services for acute sexual assault survivors in 16accordance with the requirements of this Act and provide 17sufficient protections from the risk of pregnancy to acute 18sexual assault survivors. Notwithstanding anything to the 19contrary in this paragraph, the Department may approve a 20sexual assault transfer plan for the provision of medical 21forensic services if: 22        (1) a treatment hospital with approved pediatric 23    transfer has agreed, as part of an areawide treatment 24    plan, to accept acute sexual assault survivors 13 years of 25    age or older from the proposed transfer hospital, if the 26    treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer is   HB2374- 10 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1    geographically closer to the transfer hospital than a 2    treatment hospital or another treatment hospital with 3    approved pediatric transfer and such transfer is not 4    unduly burdensome on the sexual assault survivor; and5        (2) a treatment hospital has agreed, as a part of an 6    areawide treatment plan, to accept acute sexual assault 7    survivors under 13 years of age from the proposed transfer 8    hospital and transfer to the treatment hospital would not 9    unduly burden the sexual assault survivor.10    The Department may not approve a sexual assault transfer 11plan unless a treatment hospital has agreed, as a part of an 12areawide treatment plan, to accept acute sexual assault 13survivors from the proposed transfer hospital and a transfer 14to the treatment hospital would not unduly burden the sexual 15assault survivor.16    In counties with a population of less than 1,000,000, the 17Department may not approve a sexual assault transfer plan for 18a hospital located within a 20-mile radius of a 4-year public 19university, not including community colleges, unless there is 20a treatment hospital with a sexual assault treatment plan 21approved by the Department within a 20-mile radius of the 224-year public university. 23    A transfer must be in accordance with federal and State 24laws and local ordinances.25    Hospitals located in counties with a population of less 26than 1,000,000 and within a 20-mile radius of a 4-year public   HB2374- 11 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1university shall submit an areawide sexual assault treatment 2plan that is approved by the Department. The approved areawide 3plan shall include at least one treatment hospital or 4treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer within the 520-mile radius of the 4-year public university.6    A treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer must 7submit an areawide treatment plan under Section 3 of this Act 8that includes a written agreement with a treatment hospital 9stating that the treatment hospital will provide medical 10forensic services to pediatric sexual assault survivors 11transferred from the treatment hospital with approved 12pediatric transfer. The areawide treatment plan may also 13include an approved pediatric health care facility.14    A transfer hospital must submit an areawide treatment plan 15under Section 3 of this Act that includes a written agreement 16with a treatment hospital stating that the treatment hospital 17will provide medical forensic services to all sexual assault 18survivors transferred from the transfer hospital. The areawide 19treatment plan may also include an approved pediatric health 20care facility. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in 21this paragraph, the areawide treatment plan may include a 22written agreement with a treatment hospital with approved 23pediatric transfer that is geographically closer than other 24hospitals providing medical forensic services to sexual 25assault survivors 13 years of age or older stating that the 26treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer will   HB2374- 12 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1provide medical services to sexual assault survivors 13 years 2of age or older who are transferred from the transfer 3hospital. If the areawide treatment plan includes a written 4agreement with a treatment hospital with approved pediatric 5transfer, it must also include a written agreement with a 6treatment hospital stating that the treatment hospital will 7provide medical forensic services to sexual assault survivors 8under 13 years of age who are transferred from the transfer 9hospital. 10    Beginning January 1, 2019, each treatment hospital and 11treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer shall 12ensure that emergency department attending physicians, 13physician assistants, advanced practice registered nurses, and 14registered professional nurses providing clinical services, 15who do not meet the definition of a qualified medical provider 16in Section 1a of this Act, receive a minimum of 2 hours of 17sexual assault training by July 1, 2020 or until the treatment 18hospital or treatment hospital with approved pediatric 19transfer certifies to the Department, in a form and manner 20prescribed by the Department, that it employs or contracts 21with a qualified medical provider in accordance with 22subsection (a-7) of Section 5, whichever occurs first.23    After July 1, 2020 or once a treatment hospital or a 24treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer certifies 25compliance with subsection (a-7) of Section 5, whichever 26occurs first, each treatment hospital and treatment hospital   HB2374- 13 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1with approved pediatric transfer shall ensure that emergency 2department attending physicians, physician assistants, 3advanced practice registered nurses, and registered 4professional nurses providing clinical services, who do not 5meet the definition of a qualified medical provider in Section 61a of this Act, receive a minimum of 2 hours of continuing 7education on responding to acute sexual assault survivors 8every 2 years. Protocols for training shall be included in the 9hospital's sexual assault treatment plan. 10    Sexual assault training provided under this subsection may 11be provided in person or online and shall include, but not be 12limited to: 13        (1) information provided on the provision of medical 14    forensic services;15        (2) information on the use of the Illinois Sexual 16    Assault Evidence Collection Kit;17        (3) information on sexual assault epidemiology, 18    neurobiology of trauma, drug-facilitated sexual assault, 19    child sexual abuse, and Illinois sexual assault-related 20    laws; and21        (4) information on the hospital's sexual 22    assault-related policies and procedures.23    The online training made available by the Office of the 24Attorney General under subsection (b) of Section 10 may be 25used to comply with this subsection. 26    (a-5) A hospital must submit a plan to provide either (i)   HB2374- 14 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1transfer services to all acute sexual assault survivors, (ii) 2medical forensic services to all acute sexual assault 3survivors, or (iii) transfer services to pediatric acute 4sexual assault survivors and medical forensic services to 5sexual assault survivors 13 years old or older as required in 6subsection (a) of this Section within 60 days of the 7Department's request. Failure to submit a plan as described in 8this subsection shall subject a hospital to the imposition of 9a fine by the Department. The Department may impose a fine of 10up to $500 per day until the hospital submits a plan as 11described in this subsection. 12    (a-10) Upon receipt of a plan as described in subsection 13(a-5), the Department shall notify the hospital whether or not 14the plan is acceptable. If the Department determines that the 15plan is unacceptable, the hospital must submit a modified plan 16within 10 days of service of the notification. If the 17Department determines that the modified plan is unacceptable, 18or if the hospital fails to submit a modified plan within 10 19days, the Department may impose a fine of up to $500 per day 20until an acceptable plan has been submitted, as determined by 21the Department. 22    (b) An approved pediatric health care facility may provide 23medical forensic services, in accordance with rules adopted by 24the Department, to acute all sexual assault survivors under 25the age of 18 who present for medical forensic services in 26relation to injuries or trauma resulting from a sexual   HB2374- 15 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1assault. These services shall be provided by a qualified 2medical provider. 3    A pediatric health care facility must participate in or 4submit an areawide treatment plan under Section 3 of this Act 5that includes a treatment hospital. If a pediatric health care 6facility does not provide certain medical or surgical services 7that are provided by hospitals, the areawide sexual assault 8treatment plan must include a procedure for ensuring a sexual 9assault survivor in need of such medical or surgical services 10receives the services at the treatment hospital. The areawide 11treatment plan may also include a treatment hospital with 12approved pediatric transfer.13    The Department shall review a proposed sexual assault 14treatment plan submitted by a pediatric health care facility 15within 60 days after receipt of the plan. If the Department 16finds that the proposed plan meets the minimum requirements 17set forth in Section 5 of this Act and that implementation of 18the proposed plan would provide medical forensic services for 19acute sexual assault survivors under the age of 18, then the 20Department shall approve the plan. If the Department does not 21approve a plan, then the Department shall notify the pediatric 22health care facility that the proposed plan has not been 23approved. The pediatric health care facility shall have 30 24days to submit a revised plan. The Department shall review the 25revised plan within 30 days after receipt of the plan and 26notify the pediatric health care facility whether the revised   HB2374- 16 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1plan is approved or rejected. A pediatric health care facility 2may not provide medical forensic services to sexual assault 3survivors under the age of 18 who present with a complaint of 4acute sexual assault within a minimum of the last 7 days or who 5have disclosed past sexual assault by a specific individual 6and were in the care of that individual within a minimum of the 7last 7 days until the Department has approved a treatment 8plan.9    If an approved pediatric health care facility is not open 1024 hours a day, 7 days a week, it shall post signage at each 11public entrance to its facility that: 12        (1) is at least 14 inches by 14 inches in size;13        (2) directs those seeking services as follows: "If 14    closed, call 911 for services or go to the closest 15    hospital emergency department, (insert name) located at 16    (insert address).";17        (3) lists the approved pediatric health care 18    facility's hours of operation;19        (4) lists the street address of the building;20        (5) has a black background with white bold capital 21    lettering in a clear and easy to read font that is at least 22    72-point type, and with "call 911" in at least 125-point 23    type;24        (6) is posted clearly and conspicuously on or adjacent 25    to the door at each entrance and, if building materials 26    allow, is posted internally for viewing through glass; if   HB2374- 17 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1    posted externally, the sign shall be made of 2    weather-resistant and theft-resistant materials, 3    non-removable, and adhered permanently to the building; 4    and5        (7) has lighting that is part of the sign itself or is 6    lit with a dedicated light that fully illuminates the 7    sign.8    A copy of the proposed sign must be submitted to the 9Department and approved as part of the approved pediatric 10health care facility's sexual assault treatment plan. 11    (c) Each treatment hospital, treatment hospital with 12approved pediatric transfer, and approved pediatric health 13care facility must enter into a memorandum of understanding 14with a rape crisis center for medical advocacy services, if 15these services are available to the treatment hospital, 16treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer, or 17approved pediatric health care facility. With the consent of 18the sexual assault survivor, a rape crisis counselor shall 19remain in the exam room during the collection for forensic 20evidence.21    (d) Every treatment hospital, treatment hospital with 22approved pediatric transfer, and approved pediatric health 23care facility's sexual assault treatment plan or sexual 24assault transfer plan shall include procedures for complying 25with mandatory reporting requirements pursuant to (1) the 26Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act; (2) the Abused and   HB2374- 18 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1Neglected Long Term Care Facility Residents Reporting Act; (3) 2the Adult Protective Services Act; and (iv) the Criminal 3Identification Act.4    (e) Each treatment hospital, treatment hospital with 5approved pediatric transfer, and approved pediatric health 6care facility shall submit to the Department every 6 months, 7in a manner prescribed by the Department, the following 8information: 9        (1) The total number of patients who presented with a 10    complaint of sexual assault.11        (2) The total number of Illinois Sexual Assault 12    Evidence Collection Kits: 13            (A) offered to (i) all acute sexual assault 14        survivors and (ii) pediatric acute sexual assault 15        survivors pursuant to paragraph (1.5) of subsection 16        (a-5) of Section 5;17            (B) completed for (i) all acute sexual assault 18        survivors and (ii) pediatric acute sexual assault 19        survivors; and20            (C) declined by (i) all acute sexual assault 21        survivors and (ii) pediatric acute sexual assault 22        survivors.23    This information shall be made available on the 24Department's website.25    (f) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 262024.   HB2374- 19 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1(Source: P.A. 101-73, eff. 7-12-19; 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 2102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 102-674, eff. 11-30-21; 102-1106, eff. 31-1-23.) 4    (410 ILCS 70/2.05)5    Sec. 2.05. Department requirements.6    (a) The Department shall periodically conduct on-site 7reviews of approved sexual assault treatment plans with 8hospital and approved pediatric health care facility personnel 9to ensure that the established procedures are being followed. 10Department personnel conducting the on-site reviews shall 11attend 4 hours of sexual assault training conducted by a 12qualified medical provider that includes, but is not limited 13to, forensic evidence collection provided to acute sexual 14assault survivors of any age and Illinois sexual 15assault-related laws and administrative rules.16    (b) On July 1, 2019 and each July 1 thereafter, the 17Department shall submit a report to the General Assembly 18containing information on the hospitals and pediatric health 19care facilities in this State that have submitted a plan to 20provide: (i) transfer services to all acute sexual assault 21survivors, (ii) medical forensic services to all acute sexual 22assault survivors, (iii) transfer services to pediatric acute 23sexual assault survivors and medical forensic services to 24acute sexual assault survivors 13 years old or older, or (iv) 25medical forensic services to acute pediatric sexual assault   HB2374- 20 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1survivors. The Department shall post the report on its 2Internet website on or before October 1, 2019 and, except as 3otherwise provided in this Section, update the report every 4quarter thereafter. The report shall include all of the 5following:6        (1) Each hospital and pediatric care facility that has 7    submitted a plan, including the submission date of the 8    plan, type of plan submitted, and the date the plan was 9    approved or denied. If a pediatric health care facility 10    withdraws its plan, the Department shall immediately 11    update the report on its Internet website to remove the 12    pediatric health care facility's name and information.13        (2) Each hospital that has failed to submit a plan as 14    required in subsection (a) of Section 2.15        (3) Each hospital and approved pediatric care facility 16    that has to submit an acceptable Plan of Correction within 17    the time required by Section 2.1, including the date the 18    Plan of Correction was required to be submitted. Once a 19    hospital or approved pediatric health care facility 20    submits and implements the required Plan of Correction, 21    the Department shall immediately update the report on its 22    Internet website to reflect that hospital or approved 23    pediatric health care facility's compliance.24        (4) Each hospital and approved pediatric care facility 25    at which the periodic on-site review required by Section 26    2.05 of this Act has been conducted, including the date of   HB2374- 21 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1    the on-site review and whether the hospital or approved 2    pediatric care facility was found to be in compliance with 3    its approved plan.4        (5) Each areawide treatment plan submitted to the 5    Department pursuant to Section 3 of this Act, including 6    which treatment hospitals, treatment hospitals with 7    approved pediatric transfer, transfer hospitals and 8    approved pediatric health care facilities are identified 9    in each areawide treatment plan. 10    (c) The Department, in consultation with the Office of the 11Attorney General, shall adopt administrative rules by January 121, 2020 establishing a process for physicians and physician 13assistants to provide documentation of training and clinical 14experience that meets or is substantially similar to the 15Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Education Guidelines established 16by the International Association of Forensic Nurses in order 17to qualify as a sexual assault forensic examiner. 18    (d) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 192024. 20(Source: P.A. 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 21102-674, eff. 11-30-21.) 22    (410 ILCS 70/2.1)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 87-2.1)23    Sec. 2.1. Plan of correction; penalties. 24    (a) If the Department surveyor determines that the 25hospital or approved pediatric health care facility is not in   HB2374- 22 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1compliance with its approved plan and rules adopted under this 2Act, the surveyor shall provide the hospital or approved 3pediatric health care facility with a written warning of 4violation and a statement of deficiencies listing the list of 5the specific items of noncompliance within 10 working days 6after the conclusion of the on-site review. The hospital shall 7have 10 working days to submit to the Department a plan of 8correction which contains the hospital's or approved pediatric 9health care facility's specific proposals for correcting the 10items of noncompliance. The Department shall review the plan 11of correction and notify the hospital in writing within 10 12working days as to whether the plan is acceptable or 13unacceptable.14    If the Department finds the Plan of Correction 15unacceptable, the hospital or approved pediatric health care 16facility shall have 10 working days to resubmit an acceptable 17Plan of Correction. Upon notification that its Plan of 18Correction is acceptable, a hospital or approved pediatric 19health care facility shall implement the Plan of Correction 20within 60 days.21    (b) The failure of a hospital to submit an acceptable Plan 22of Correction or to implement the Plan of Correction, within 23the time frames required in this Section, will subject a 24hospital to the imposition of a $500 fine by the Department. 25The Department may impose a fine of up to $500 per day until a 26hospital complies with the requirements of this Section. If a   HB2374- 23 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1hospital submits 2 Plans of Correction that are found to not be 2acceptable by the Department, the hospital shall become 3subject to the imposition of a $2,500 fine by the Department. 4    If an approved pediatric health care facility fails to 5submit an acceptable Plan of Correction or to implement the 6Plan of Correction within the time frames required in this 7Section, then the Department shall notify the approved 8pediatric health care facility that the approved pediatric 9health care facility may not provide medical forensic services 10under this Act. The Department may impose a fine of up to $500 11per patient provided services in violation of this Act. If an 12approved pediatric facility submits 2 Plans of Correction that 13are found to not be acceptable by the Department, the approved 14pediatric health care facility shall become subject to the 15imposition of a fine by the Department and the termination of 16its approved sexual assault treatment plan. 17    (c) Before imposing a fine pursuant to this Section, the 18Department shall provide the hospital or approved pediatric 19health care facility via certified mail with written notice 20and an opportunity for an administrative hearing. Such hearing 21must be requested within 10 working days after receipt of the 22Department's Notice. All hearings shall be conducted in 23accordance with the Department's rules in administrative 24hearings.25    (c-5) The Department shall find a hospital in violation of 26this subsection if, after the issuance of a written warning to   HB2374- 24 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1the hospital as described in subsection (a), the Department's 2investigation finds that the hospital committed one or more of 3the following violations:4        (1) allowing a nonqualified medical provider to 5    perform and complete the medical forensic service 6    examination;7        (2) refusing to offer a medical forensic service 8    examination to the sexual assault survivor;9        (3) failing to provide medical management for sexually 10    transmitted infections, medical management for HIV, and 11    emergency contraception; or12        (4) failing to offer photographic evidence, failing to 13    secure photographic evidence, or violating Section 6.5.14    The Department shall impose a fine of $3,000 for an 15initial violation of this subsection and a fine of $5,000 for 16each subsequent violation.17    (d) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 182024. 19(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 20102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 102-674, eff. 11-30-21; 102-1106, eff. 211-1-23.) 22    (410 ILCS 70/2.2)23    Sec. 2.2. Emergency contraception. 24    (a) The General Assembly finds:25        (1) Crimes of sexual assault and sexual abuse cause   HB2374- 25 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1    significant physical, emotional, and psychological trauma 2    to the victims. This trauma is compounded by a victim's 3    fear of becoming pregnant and bearing a child as a result 4    of the sexual assault.5        (2) Each year over 32,000 women become pregnant in the 6    United States as the result of rape and approximately 50% 7    of these pregnancies end in abortion.8        (3) As approved for use by the Federal Food and Drug 9    Administration (FDA), emergency contraception can 10    significantly reduce the risk of pregnancy if taken within 11    72 hours after the sexual assault.12        (4) By providing emergency contraception to rape 13    victims in a timely manner, the trauma of rape can be 14    significantly reduced.15    (b) Every hospital or approved pediatric health care 16facility providing services to sexual assault survivors in 17accordance with a plan approved under Section 2 must develop a 18protocol that ensures that each survivor of acute sexual 19assault will receive medically and factually accurate and 20written and oral information about emergency contraception; 21the indications and contraindications and risks associated 22with the use of emergency contraception; and a description of 23how and when victims may be provided emergency contraception 24at no cost upon the written order of a physician licensed to 25practice medicine in all its branches, a licensed advanced 26practice registered nurse, or a licensed physician assistant.   HB2374- 26 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1The Department shall approve the protocol if it finds that the 2implementation of the protocol would provide sufficient 3protection for survivors of acute sexual assault.4    The hospital or approved pediatric health care facility 5shall implement the protocol upon approval by the Department. 6The Department shall adopt rules and regulations establishing 7one or more safe harbor protocols and setting minimum 8acceptable protocol standards that hospitals may develop and 9implement. The Department shall approve any protocol that 10meets those standards. The Department may provide a sample 11acceptable protocol upon request.12    (c) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 132024. 14(Source: P.A. 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 15102-674, eff. 11-30-21.) 16    (410 ILCS 70/5)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 87-5)17    Sec. 5. Minimum requirements for medical forensic services 18provided to sexual assault survivors by hospitals and approved 19pediatric health care facilities.20    (a) Every hospital and approved pediatric health care 21facility providing medical forensic services to acute sexual 22assault survivors under this Act shall, as minimum 23requirements for such services, provide, with the consent of 24the sexual assault survivor, and as ordered by the attending 25physician, an advanced practice registered nurse, or a   HB2374- 27 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1physician assistant, the services set forth in subsection 2(a-5).3    A qualified medical provider must provide the services set 4forth in subsection (a-5). 5    (a-5) A treatment hospital, a treatment hospital with 6approved pediatric transfer, or an approved pediatric health 7care facility shall provide the following services in 8accordance with subsection (a): 9        (1) Appropriate medical forensic services without 10    delay, in a private, age-appropriate or 11    developmentally-appropriate space, required to ensure the 12    health, safety, and welfare of a sexual assault survivor 13    and which may be used as evidence in a criminal proceeding 14    against a person accused of the sexual assault, in a 15    proceeding under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, or in an 16    investigation under the Abused and Neglected Child 17    Reporting Act.18        Records of medical forensic services, including 19    results of examinations and tests, the Illinois State 20    Police Medical Forensic Documentation Forms, the Illinois 21    State Police Patient Discharge Materials, and the Illinois 22    State Police Patient Consent: Collect and Test Evidence or 23    Collect and Hold Evidence Form, shall be maintained by the 24    hospital or approved pediatric health care facility as 25    part of the patient's electronic medical record. 26        Records of medical forensic services of sexual assault   HB2374- 28 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1    survivors under the age of 18 shall be retained by the 2    hospital for a period of 60 years after the sexual assault 3    survivor reaches the age of 18. Records of medical 4    forensic services of sexual assault survivors 18 years of 5    age or older shall be retained by the hospital for a period 6    of 20 years after the date the record was created. 7        Records of medical forensic services may only be 8    disseminated in accordance with Section 6.5 of this Act 9    and other State and federal law. 10        (1.5) An offer to complete the Illinois Sexual Assault 11    Evidence Collection Kit for any acute sexual assault 12    survivor who presents within a minimum of the last 7 days 13    of the assault or who has disclosed past sexual assault by 14    a specific individual and was in the care of that 15    individual within a minimum of the last 7 days. Nothing in 16    this Section is intended to prohibit a qualified medical 17    provider from offering an Illinois Sexual Assault Evidence 18    Collection Kit to a sexual assault survivor who presents 19    at a treatment hospital or approved pediatric health care 20    facility with a nonacute complaint of sexual assault if 21    there is a compelling reason for evidence collection, or 22    upon the request of the survivor. 23            (A) Appropriate oral and written information 24        concerning evidence-based guidelines for the 25        appropriateness of evidence collection depending on 26        the sexual development of the sexual assault survivor,   HB2374- 29 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1        the type of sexual assault, and the timing of the 2        sexual assault shall be provided to the sexual assault 3        survivor. Evidence collection is encouraged for 4        prepubescent sexual assault survivors who present to a 5        hospital or approved pediatric health care facility 6        with a complaint of acute sexual assault within a 7        minimum of 96 hours after the sexual assault. 8            The information required under this subparagraph 9        shall be provided in person by the qualified medical 10        provider providing medical forensic services directly 11        to the sexual assault survivor.12            The written information provided shall be the 13        information created in accordance with Section 10 of 14        this Act. 15            (B) Following the discussion regarding the 16        evidence-based guidelines for evidence collection in 17        accordance with subparagraph (A), evidence collection 18        must be completed at the sexual assault survivor's 19        request. A sexual assault nurse examiner conducting an 20        examination using the Illinois State Police Sexual 21        Assault Evidence Collection Kit may do so without the 22        presence or participation of a physician.23        (2) Appropriate oral and written information 24    concerning the possibility of infection, sexually 25    transmitted infection, including an evaluation of the 26    sexual assault survivor's risk of contracting human   HB2374- 30 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1    immunodeficiency virus (HIV) from sexual assault, and 2    pregnancy resulting from sexual assault.3        (3) Appropriate oral and written information 4    concerning accepted medical procedures, laboratory tests, 5    medication, and possible contraindications of such 6    medication available for the prevention or treatment of 7    infection or disease resulting from sexual assault.8        (3.5) After a medical evidentiary or physical 9    examination, access to a shower at no cost, unless 10    showering facilities are unavailable.11        (4) An amount of medication, including HIV 12    prophylaxis, for treatment at the hospital or approved 13    pediatric health care facility and after discharge as is 14    deemed appropriate by the attending physician, an advanced 15    practice registered nurse, or a physician assistant in 16    accordance with the Centers for Disease Control and 17    Prevention guidelines and consistent with the hospital's 18    or approved pediatric health care facility's current 19    approved protocol for sexual assault survivors.20        (5) Photo documentation of the sexual assault 21    survivor's injuries, anatomy involved in the assault, or 22    other visible evidence on the sexual assault survivor's 23    body to supplement the medical forensic history and 24    written documentation of physical findings and evidence 25    beginning July 1, 2019. Photo documentation does not 26    replace written documentation of the injury.  HB2374- 31 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1        (6) Written and oral instructions indicating the need 2    for follow-up examinations and laboratory tests after the 3    sexual assault to determine the presence or absence of 4    sexually transmitted infection.5        (7) Referral by hospital or approved pediatric health 6    care facility personnel for appropriate counseling.7        (8) Medical advocacy services provided by a rape 8    crisis counselor whose communications are protected under 9    Section 8-802.1 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if there 10    is a memorandum of understanding between the hospital or 11    approved pediatric health care facility and a rape crisis 12    center. With the consent of the sexual assault survivor, a 13    rape crisis counselor shall remain in the exam room during 14    the medical forensic examination. 15        (9) Written information regarding services provided by 16    a Children's Advocacy Center and rape crisis center, if 17    applicable. 18        (10) A treatment hospital, a treatment hospital with 19    approved pediatric transfer, an out-of-state hospital as 20    defined in Section 5.4, or an approved pediatric health 21    care facility shall comply with the rules relating to the 22    collection and tracking of sexual assault evidence adopted 23    by the Illinois State Police under Section 50 of the 24    Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 25        (11) Written information regarding the Illinois State 26    Police sexual assault evidence tracking system.   HB2374- 32 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1    (a-7) Every hospital, and approved pediatric health care 2facility, with a treatment plan approved by the Department 3shall employ or contract with a qualified medical provider to 4initiate medical forensic services to a sexual assault 5survivor within 90 minutes of a concern of acute sexual 6assault arising at the hospital or facility. the patient 7presenting to the treatment hospital or treatment hospital 8with approved pediatric transfer. The provision of medical 9forensic services by a qualified medical provider shall not 10delay the provision of life-saving medical care. 11    (b) Any person who is a sexual assault survivor who seeks 12medical forensic services or follow-up healthcare under this 13Act shall be provided such services without the consent of any 14parent, guardian, custodian, surrogate, or agent. If a sexual 15assault survivor is unable to consent to medical forensic 16services, the services may be provided under the Consent by 17Minors to Health Care Services Act, the Health Care Surrogate 18Act, or other applicable State and federal laws. 19    (b-5) Every hospital or approved pediatric health care 20facility providing medical forensic services to sexual assault 21survivors shall issue a voucher to any sexual assault survivor 22who is eligible to receive one in accordance with Section 5.2 23of this Act. The hospital shall make a copy of the voucher and 24place it in the medical record of the sexual assault survivor. 25The hospital shall provide a copy of the voucher to the sexual 26assault survivor after discharge upon request.  HB2374- 33 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1    (c) Nothing in this Section creates a physician-patient 2relationship that extends beyond discharge from the hospital 3or approved pediatric health care facility. 4    (d) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 52024. 6(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-377, eff. 8-16-19; 7101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 102-538, eff. 88-20-21; 102-674, eff. 11-30-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 9102-1106, eff. 1-1-23.) 10    (410 ILCS 70/5.3)11    Sec. 5.3. Pediatric sexual assault care.12    (a) The General Assembly finds: 13        (1) Pediatric sexual assault survivors can suffer from 14    a wide range of health problems across their life span. In 15    addition to immediate health issues, such as sexually 16    transmitted infections, physical injuries, and 17    psychological trauma, child sexual abuse victims are at 18    greater risk for a plethora of adverse psychological and 19    somatic problems into adulthood in contrast to those who 20    were not sexually abused.21        (2) Sexual abuse against the pediatric population is 22    distinct, particularly due to their dependence on their 23    caregivers and the ability of perpetrators to manipulate 24    and silence them (especially when the perpetrators are 25    family members or other adults trusted by, or with power   HB2374- 34 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1    over, children). Sexual abuse is often hidden by 2    perpetrators, unwitnessed by others, and may leave no 3    obvious physical signs on child victims.4        (3) Pediatric sexual assault survivors throughout the 5    State should have access to qualified medical providers 6    who have received specialized training regarding the care 7    of pediatric sexual assault survivors within a reasonable 8    distance from their home.9        (4) There is a need in Illinois to increase the number 10    of qualified medical providers available to provide 11    medical forensic services to pediatric sexual assault 12    survivors. 13    (b) If a medically stable pediatric sexual assault 14survivor presents at a transfer hospital or treatment hospital 15with approved pediatric transfer that has a plan approved by 16the Department requesting medical forensic services, then the 17hospital emergency department staff shall contact an approved 18pediatric health care facility, if one is designated in the 19hospital's plan. 20    If the transferring hospital confirms that medical 21forensic services can be initiated within 90 minutes of the 22acute sexual assault survivor's patient's arrival at the 23approved pediatric health care facility following an immediate 24transfer, then the hospital emergency department staff shall 25notify the patient and non-offending parent or legal guardian 26that the patient will be transferred for medical forensic   HB2374- 35 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1services and shall provide the patient and non-offending 2parent or legal guardian the option of being transferred to 3the approved pediatric health care facility or the treatment 4hospital designated in the hospital's plan. The pediatric 5sexual assault survivor may be transported by ambulance, law 6enforcement, or personal vehicle.7    If medical forensic services cannot be initiated within 90 8minutes of the acute sexual assault survivor's patient's 9arrival at the approved pediatric health care facility, there 10is no approved pediatric health care facility designated in 11the hospital's plan, or the patient or non-offending parent or 12legal guardian chooses to be transferred to a treatment 13hospital, the hospital emergency department staff shall 14contact a treatment hospital designated in the hospital's plan 15to arrange for the transfer of the patient to the treatment 16hospital for medical forensic services, which are to be 17initiated within 90 minutes of the patient's arrival at the 18treatment hospital. The treatment hospital shall provide 19medical forensic services and may not transfer the patient to 20another facility. The pediatric sexual assault survivor may be 21transported by ambulance, law enforcement, or personal 22vehicle. 23    (c) If a medically stable pediatric sexual assault 24survivor presents at a treatment hospital that has a plan 25approved by the Department requesting medical forensic 26services, then the hospital emergency department staff shall   HB2374- 36 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1contact an approved pediatric health care facility, if one is 2designated in the treatment hospital's areawide treatment 3plan. 4    If medical forensic services can be initiated within 90 5minutes after the acute sexual assault survivor's patient's 6arrival at the approved pediatric health care facility 7following an immediate transfer, the hospital emergency 8department staff shall provide the patient and non-offending 9parent or legal guardian the option of having medical forensic 10services performed at the treatment hospital or at the 11approved pediatric health care facility. If the patient or 12non-offending parent or legal guardian chooses to be 13transferred, the pediatric sexual assault survivor may be 14transported by ambulance, law enforcement, or personal 15vehicle.16    If medical forensic services cannot be initiated within 90 17minutes after the acute sexual assault survivor's patient's 18arrival to the approved pediatric health care facility, there 19is no approved pediatric health care facility designated in 20the hospital's plan, or the patient or non-offending parent or 21legal guardian chooses not to be transferred, the hospital 22shall provide medical forensic services to the patient. 23    (d) If a pediatric acute sexual assault survivor presents 24at an approved pediatric health care facility during posted 25hours of operation requesting medical forensic services or the 26facility is contacted by law enforcement or the Department of   HB2374- 37 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1Children and Family Services requesting medical forensic 2services for a pediatric acute sexual assault survivor, the 3services shall be provided at the facility if the medical 4forensic services can be initiated within 90 minutes after the 5patient's arrival at the facility. If medical forensic 6services cannot be initiated within 90 minutes after the acute 7sexual assault survivor's patient's arrival at the facility, 8then the patient shall be transferred to a treatment hospital 9designated in the approved pediatric health care facility's 10plan for medical forensic services. The pediatric sexual 11assault survivor may be transported by ambulance, law 12enforcement, or personal vehicle. 13    (e) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 142024. 15(Source: P.A. 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 16102-674, eff. 11-30-21.) 17    (410 ILCS 70/5.4)18    Sec. 5.4. Out-of-state hospitals.19    (a) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the transfer of 20a patient in need of medical services from a hospital that has 21been designated as a trauma center by the Department in 22accordance with Section 3.90 of the Emergency Medical Services 23(EMS) Systems Act.24    (b) A transfer hospital, treatment hospital with approved 25pediatric transfer, or approved pediatric health care facility   HB2374- 38 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1may transfer a sexual assault survivor to an out-of-state 2hospital that is located in a county that borders Illinois if 3the out-of-state hospital: (1) submits an areawide treatment 4plan approved by the Department; and (2) has certified the 5following to the Department in a form and manner prescribed by 6the Department that the out-of-state hospital will: 7        (i) consent to the jurisdiction of the Department in 8    accordance with Section 2.06 of this Act;9        (ii) comply with all requirements of this Act 10    applicable to treatment hospitals, including, but not 11    limited to, offering evidence collection to any Illinois 12    sexual assault survivor who presents with a complaint of 13    acute sexual assault within a minimum of the last 7 days or 14    who has disclosed past sexual assault by a specific 15    individual and was in the care of that individual within a 16    minimum of the last 7 days and not billing the sexual 17    assault survivor for medical forensic services or 180 days 18    of follow-up healthcare;19        (iii) use an Illinois State Police Sexual Assault 20    Evidence Collection Kit to collect forensic evidence from 21    an Illinois acute sexual assault survivor;22        (iv) ensure its staff cooperates with Illinois law 23    enforcement agencies and are responsive to subpoenas 24    issued by Illinois courts; and25        (v) provide appropriate transportation upon the 26    completion of medical forensic services back to the   HB2374- 39 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1    transfer hospital or treatment hospital with pediatric 2    transfer where the sexual assault survivor initially 3    presented seeking medical forensic services, unless the 4    sexual assault survivor chooses to arrange his or her own 5    transportation.6    (c) Subsection (b) of this Section is inoperative on and 7after January 1, 2029. 8(Source: P.A. 102-1097, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1106, eff. 1-1-23; 9103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 10    (410 ILCS 70/7.5)11    Sec. 7.5. Prohibition on billing sexual assault survivors 12directly for certain services; written notice; billing 13protocols.14    (a) A hospital, approved pediatric health care facility, 15health care professional, ambulance provider, laboratory, or 16pharmacy furnishing medical forensic services, transportation, 17follow-up healthcare, or medication to a sexual assault 18survivor shall not: 19        (1) charge or submit a bill for any portion of the 20    costs of the services, transportation, or medications to 21    the sexual assault survivor, including any insurance 22    deductible, co-pay, co-insurance, denial of claim by an 23    insurer, spenddown, or any other out-of-pocket expense;24        (2) communicate with, harass, or intimidate the sexual 25    assault survivor for payment of services, including, but   HB2374- 40 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1    not limited to, repeatedly calling or writing to the 2    sexual assault survivor and threatening to refer the 3    matter to a debt collection agency or to an attorney for 4    collection, enforcement, or filing of other process;5        (3) refer a bill to a collection agency or attorney 6    for collection action against the sexual assault survivor;7        (4) contact or distribute information to affect the 8    sexual assault survivor's credit rating; or9        (5) take any other action adverse to the sexual 10    assault survivor or his or her family on account of 11    providing services to the sexual assault survivor.12    (a-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 13including, but not limited to, subsection (a), a sexual 14assault survivor who is not the subscriber or primary 15policyholder of the sexual assault survivor's insurance policy 16may opt out of billing the sexual assault survivor's private 17insurance provider. If the sexual assault survivor opts out of 18billing the sexual assault survivor's private insurance 19provider, then the bill for medical forensic services shall be 20sent to the Department of Healthcare and Family Services' 21Sexual Assault Emergency Treatment Program for reimbursement 22for the services provided to the sexual assault survivor. 23    (b) Nothing in this Section precludes a hospital, health 24care provider, ambulance provider, laboratory, or pharmacy 25from billing the sexual assault survivor or any applicable 26health insurance or coverage for inpatient services.  HB2374- 41 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1    (c) Every hospital and approved pediatric health care 2facility providing treatment services to sexual assault 3survivors in accordance with a plan approved under Section 2 4of this Act shall provide a written notice to a sexual assault 5survivor. The written notice must include, but is not limited 6to, the following:7        (1) a statement that the sexual assault survivor 8    should not be directly billed by any ambulance provider 9    providing transportation services, or by any hospital, 10    approved pediatric health care facility, health care 11    professional, laboratory, or pharmacy for the services the 12    sexual assault survivor received as an outpatient at the 13    hospital or approved pediatric health care facility;14        (2) a statement that a sexual assault survivor who is 15    admitted to a hospital may be billed for inpatient 16    services provided by a hospital, health care professional, 17    laboratory, or pharmacy;18        (3) a statement that prior to leaving the hospital or 19    approved pediatric health care facility, the hospital or 20    approved pediatric health care facility will give the 21    sexual assault survivor a sexual assault services voucher 22    for follow-up healthcare if the sexual assault survivor is 23    eligible to receive a sexual assault services voucher;24        (4) the definition of "follow-up healthcare" as set 25    forth in Section 1a of this Act;26        (5) a phone number the sexual assault survivor may   HB2374- 42 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1    call should the sexual assault survivor receive a bill 2    from the hospital or approved pediatric health care 3    facility for medical forensic services;4        (6) the toll-free phone number of the Office of the 5    Illinois Attorney General, which the sexual assault 6    survivor may call should the sexual assault survivor 7    receive a bill from an ambulance provider, approved 8    pediatric health care facility, a health care 9    professional, a laboratory, or a pharmacy.10    This subsection (c) shall not apply to hospitals that 11provide transfer services as defined under Section 1a of this 12Act.13    (d) Within 60 days after the effective date of this 14amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly, every health care 15professional, except for those employed by a hospital or 16hospital affiliate, as defined in the Hospital Licensing Act, 17or those employed by a hospital operated under the University 18of Illinois Hospital Act, who bills separately for medical or 19forensic services must develop a billing protocol that ensures 20that no survivor of sexual assault will be sent a bill for any 21medical forensic services and submit the billing protocol to 22the Department of Healthcare and Family Services Office of the 23Attorney General for approval. Within 60 days after the 24commencement of the provision of medical forensic services, 25every health care professional, except for those employed by a 26hospital or hospital affiliate, as defined in the Hospital   HB2374- 43 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1Licensing Act, or those employed by a hospital operated under 2the University of Illinois Hospital Act, who bills separately 3for medical or forensic services must develop a billing 4protocol that ensures that no survivor of sexual assault is 5sent a bill for any medical forensic services and submit the 6billing protocol to the Department of Healthcare and Family 7Services Attorney General for approval. Health care 8professionals who bill as a legal entity may submit a single 9billing protocol for the billing entity. 10    Within 60 days after the Department's approval of a 11treatment plan, an approved pediatric health care facility and 12any health care professional employed by an approved pediatric 13health care facility must develop a billing protocol that 14ensures that no survivor of sexual assault is sent a bill for 15any medical forensic services and submit the billing protocol 16to the Department of Healthcare and Family Services Office of 17the Attorney General for approval.18     The billing protocol must include at a minimum:19        (1) a description of training for persons who prepare 20    bills for medical and forensic services;21        (2) a written acknowledgement signed by a person who 22    has completed the training that the person will not bill 23    survivors of sexual assault;24        (3) prohibitions on submitting any bill for any 25    portion of medical forensic services provided to a 26    survivor of sexual assault to a collection agency;  HB2374- 44 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1        (4) prohibitions on taking any action that would 2    adversely affect the credit of the survivor of sexual 3    assault;4        (5) the termination of all collection activities if 5    the protocol is violated; and6        (6) the actions to be taken if a bill is sent to a 7    collection agency or the failure to pay is reported to any 8    credit reporting agency.9    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services Office of 10the Attorney General may provide a sample acceptable billing 11protocol upon request.12    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services Office of 13the Attorney General shall approve a proposed protocol if it 14finds that the implementation of the protocol would result in 15no survivor of sexual assault being billed or sent a bill for 16medical forensic services.17    If the Department of Healthcare and Family Services Office 18of the Attorney General determines that implementation of the 19protocol could result in the billing of a survivor of sexual 20assault for medical forensic services, the Department of 21Healthcare and Family Services Office of the Attorney General 22shall provide the health care professional or approved 23pediatric health care facility with a written statement of the 24deficiencies in the protocol. The health care professional or 25approved pediatric health care facility shall have 30 days to 26submit a revised billing protocol addressing the deficiencies   HB2374- 45 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1to the Department of Healthcare and Family Services Office of 2the Attorney General. The health care professional or approved 3pediatric health care facility shall implement the protocol 4upon approval by the Department of Healthcare and Family 5Services Office of the Attorney General.6    The health care professional or approved pediatric health 7care facility shall submit any proposed revision to or 8modification of an approved billing protocol to the Department 9of Healthcare and Family Services Office of the Attorney 10General for approval. The health care professional or approved 11pediatric health care facility shall implement the revised or 12modified billing protocol upon approval by the Department of 13Healthcare and Family Services Office of the Illinois Attorney 14General.15    (e) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 162024. 17(Source: P.A. 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 101-652, eff. 7-1-21; 18102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 102-674, eff. 11-30-21; 102-1097, eff. 191-1-23.) 20    (410 ILCS 70/10)21    Sec. 10. Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program.22    (a) The Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program is 23established within the Office of the Attorney General. The 24Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program shall maintain a list of 25sexual assault nurse examiners who have completed didactic and   HB2374- 46 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1clinical training requirements consistent with the Sexual 2Assault Nurse Examiner Education Guidelines established by the 3International Association of Forensic Nurses.4    (b) By March 1, 2019, the Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner 5Program shall develop and make available to hospitals 2 hours 6of online sexual assault training for emergency department 7clinical staff to meet the training requirement established in 8subsection (a) of Section 2. Notwithstanding any other law 9regarding ongoing licensure requirements, such training shall 10count toward the continuing medical education and continuing 11nursing education credits for physicians, physician 12assistants, advanced practice registered nurses, and 13registered professional nurses.14    The Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program shall provide 15didactic and clinical training opportunities consistent with 16the Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Education Guidelines 17established by the International Association of Forensic 18Nurses, in sufficient numbers and geographical locations 19across the State, to assist treatment hospitals and approved 20pediatric health care facilities with training the necessary 21number of sexual assault nurse examiners to comply with the 22requirement of this Act to employ or contract with a qualified 23medical provider to initiate medical forensic services to a 24sexual assault survivor within 90 minutes of a concern of 25acute sexual assault arising at the hospital or facility the 26patient presenting to the hospital as required in subsection   HB2374- 47 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1(a-7) of Section 5.2    The Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program shall assist 3hospitals in establishing trainings to achieve the 4requirements of this Act.5    For the purpose of providing continuing medical education 6credit in accordance with the Medical Practice Act of 1987 and 7administrative rules adopted under the Medical Practice Act of 81987 and continuing education credit in accordance with the 9Nurse Practice Act and administrative rules adopted under the 10Nurse Practice Act to health care professionals for the 11completion of sexual assault training provided by the Sexual 12Assault Nurse Examiner Program under this Act, the Office of 13the Attorney General shall be considered a State agency. 14    (c) The Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program, in 15consultation with qualified medical providers, shall create 16uniform materials that all treatment hospitals, treatment 17hospitals with approved pediatric transfer, and approved 18pediatric health care facilities are required to give patients 19and non-offending parents or legal guardians, if applicable, 20regarding the medical forensic exam procedure, laws regarding 21consenting to medical forensic services, and the benefits and 22risks of evidence collection, including recommended time 23frames for evidence collection pursuant to evidence-based 24research. These materials shall be made available to all 25hospitals and approved pediatric health care facilities on the 26Office of the Attorney General's website.  HB2374- 48 -LRB104 11915 BDA 22006 b1    (d) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 22024. 3(Source: P.A. 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 4102-674, eff. 11-30-21.)